Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6191.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 401. (1) A person shall not transact business in this state as a broker-dealer unless the person is registered under this act as a broker-dealer or is exempt from registration as a broker-dealer under subsection (2) or (4). (2) The following persons are exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (1): (a) A broker-dealer if the broker-dealer does not have a place of business in this state and if the broker-dealer's only transactions effected in this state are with any of the following: (i) The issuer of the securities involved in the transactions. (ii) A broker-dealer registered as a broker-dealer under this act or not required to be registered as a broker-dealer under this act. (iii) An institutional investor. (iv) A nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000.00 acting for the account of others pursuant to under discretionary authority in a signed record. (v) A bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is not in this state and the broker-dealer is registered as a broker-dealer under the securities exchange act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the securities exchange act of 1934 and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the customer maintains a principal place of residence. (vi) A bona fide preexisting customer whose principal place of residence is in this state but who was not present in this state when the customer relationship was established, if both of the following are met: (A) The broker-dealer is registered under the securities exchange act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the securities exchange act of 1934 and is registered under the securities laws of the state in which the customer relationship was established and where the customer had maintained a principal place of residence. (B) Within Not later than 45 days after the customer's first transaction in this state, the person files an application for registration as a broker-dealer in this state and a further transaction is not effected more than 75 days after the date on which the application is filed, or, if earlier, the date on which the administrator notifies the person that the administrator has denied the application for registration or has stayed the pendency of the application for good cause. (vii) Not more than 3 customers in this state during the previous 12 months, in addition to those specified in subparagraphs (i) to (vi) and under subparagraph (viii), if the broker-dealer is registered under the securities exchange act of 1934 or not required to be registered under the securities exchange act of 1934 and is registered under the securities act of the state in which the broker-dealer has its principal place of business. (viii) Any other person exempted by rule or order under this act. (b) A person that deals solely in United States government securities and is supervised as a dealer in government securities by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or the office of thrift supervision.Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Office of Thrift Supervision. (c) A For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a person licensed or registered as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer under the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684, in the offer or sale of mortgage loans as defined in section 1a of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651a. (d) Beginning on the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a person licensed as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer under the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, in the offer or sale of residential mortgage loans as that term is defined in section 6 of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act. (e) (d) A person that is registered as a Michigan investment market under article 4A and that deals in securities solely in its capacity as a Michigan investment market. (3) A broker-dealer, or an issuer engaged in offering, offering to purchase, purchasing, or selling securities in this state, shall not directly or indirectly employ or associate with an individual to engage in an activity related to securities transactions in this state if the registration of the individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-dealer, an issuer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser by an order of the administrator under this act, the securities and exchange commission, a securities regulator of another state, or a self-regulatory organization. A broker-dealer or issuer does not violate this subsection if the broker-dealer or issuer did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the suspension, revocation, or bar. If requested by a broker-dealer or issuer and if good cause is shown, an order under this act may modify or waive, in whole or in part, the application of the prohibitions of this subsection. (4) A rule or order under this act may permit any of the following: (a) A broker-dealer that is registered in Canada or other foreign jurisdiction and that does not have a place of business in this state to effect transactions in securities with or for, or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of any securities by, any of the following: (i) An individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is temporarily present in this state and with whom the broker-dealer had a bona fide customer relationship before the individual entered the United States. (ii) An individual from Canada or other foreign jurisdiction who is present in this state and whose transactions are in a self-directed tax advantaged retirement plan of which the individual is the holder or contributor in that foreign jurisdiction. (iii) An individual who is present in this state, with whom the broker-dealer customer relationship arose while the individual was temporarily or permanently resident in Canada or the other foreign jurisdiction. (b) An agent who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under this subsection to effect transactions in securities or attempt to effect the purchase or sale of any securities in this state as permitted for a broker-dealer described in subdivision (a). Sec. 402. (1) An individual shall not transact business in this state as an agent unless the individual is registered under this act as an agent or is exempt from registration as an agent under subsection (2). (2) Each of the following individuals is exempt from the registration requirement of subsection (1): (a) An individual who represents a broker-dealer in effecting transactions in this state limited to those described in section 15(h)(2) of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78o. (b) An individual who represents a broker-dealer that is exempt under section 401(2) or (4). (c) An individual who represents an issuer with respect to an offer or sale of the issuer's own securities or those of the issuer's parent or any of the issuer's subsidiaries, and who is not compensated in connection with the individual's participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities. (d) An individual who represents an issuer and who effects transactions in the issuer's securities exempted by section 202, other than section 202(1)(k) or (n). (e) An individual who represents an issuer who effects transactions solely in federal covered securities of the issuer, but an individual who effects transactions in a federal covered security under section 18(b)(3) or 18(b)(4)(D) (4)(D) of the securities act of 1933, 15 USC 77r, is not exempt if the individual is compensated in connection with the agent's participation by the payment of commissions or other remuneration based, directly or indirectly, on transactions in those securities. (f) An individual who represents a broker-dealer registered in this state under section 401(1) or exempt from registration under section 401(2) in the offer and sale of securities for an account of a nonaffiliated federal covered investment adviser with investments under management in excess of $100,000,000.00 acting for the account of others pursuant to under discretionary authority in a signed record. (g) An individual who represents an issuer in connection with the purchase of the issuer's own securities. (h) An individual who represents an issuer and who restricts participation to performing clerical or ministerial acts. (i) An For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, an employee of a person licensed or registered under the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684, in the offer or sale of mortgage loans, as that term is defined in section 1a of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651a, when acting as an employee of the licensed or registered person. (j) Beginning on the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, an employee of a person licensed as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer under the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, in the offer or sale of residential mortgage loans, as that term is defined in section 6 of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, when acting as an employee of the licensee. (k) (j) Any other individual exempted by rule or order under this act. (3) The registration of an agent is effective only while the agent is employed by or associated with a broker-dealer registered under this act or an issuer that is offering, selling, or purchasing its securities in this state. (4) A broker-dealer, or an issuer engaged in offering, selling, or purchasing securities in this state, shall not employ or associate with an agent who transacts business in this state on behalf of broker-dealers or issuers unless the agent is registered under subsection (1) or exempt from registration under subsection (2). (5) An individual shall not act as an agent for more than 1 broker-dealer or more than 1 issuer at a time, unless the broker-dealers or the issuers for which the agent acts are affiliated by direct or indirect common control or are authorized by rule or order under this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6177 (request no. H05171'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.